Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5466HV (1) 91 lh/ns H.F. 2294 Section 1. Section 23.7, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 3 providing for the timing, form, content, and means by which any 4 aggrieved person, any taxpayer to or citizen of this state, the 5 attorney general, or any county attorney may file a complaint 6 with the board alleging a violation of chapter 21 or 22 . The 7 complaint must be filed within sixty ninety days from the time 8 the alleged violation occurred or the complainant could have 9 become aware of the violation with reasonable diligence. All 10 complaints filed with the board shall be public records. 11